New York, session 2025-2026, S4616.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 414 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Schoolhouses and grounds in the custody and under the control and 4 supervision of trustees or a board of education of a district outside a 5 city of one million or more shall be prohibited from being used for the 6 purposes of providing permanent or temporary housing for migrant popu- 7 lations. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05433-01-5